Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202575-342
Certain services; specific authorization from commission required; conditions.

No transportation network company or participating driver shall provide transportation for any person under contract with the Department of Health and Human Services or any contractors of the Department of Health and Human Services without specific authorization from the commission. The commission shall grant specific authorization to a requesting transportation network company or participating driver, unless a protestant shows that (1) existing carriers are currently meeting, or will meet, the proposed need for the proposed service and (2) that even if the applicant's service will be responsive to a public demand or need, that applicant would not be able to serve this need in a specified manner without endangering or impairing the operations of existing carriers contrary to the public interest.

Laws 2015, LB629, § 21;

Laws 2025, LB311, § 15.